Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 2. GENERAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO LICENSING

CHAPTER 52. TRANSFER OF LICENSE

Sec. 52.001. TRANSFER OF LICENSE PERMITTED. Except as otherwise provided by law, a person who owns or holds a license to engage in an occupation issued in accordance with the laws of this state may transfer the license in the records of the licensing entity.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 52.002. AUTHORITY TO ENGAGE IN OCCUPATION AFTER ACQUIRING LICENSE. A person who purchases or is assigned a license to engage in an occupation may engage in that occupation under the license during the unexpired term of the license after the person has complied with the legal requirements provided for in original applications for those licenses.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 52.003. MULTIPLE HOLDERS OF SINGLE LICENSE PROHIBITED. This chapter does not permit two or more persons to engage in the same occupation under one license at the same time.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 52.004. SALE OF CERTAIN LICENSES. (a) A license held by a person to engage in an occupation is considered an asset of the person and may be sold in the same manner as the person's other property if the entity operating under the license is closed out by legal process.

(b) A person who purchases a license sold under Subsection (a) may engage in that occupation under the license or transfer the license to another person.

(c) A license transferred under Subsection (b) may be transferred only one time.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.